Maine, session 132, LD10.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4552, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §1, is further amended to
read:
§4552. Policy
To protect the public health, safety and welfare, it is declared to be the policy of this
State to keep continually in review all practices infringing on the basic human right to a
life with dignity, and the causes of these practices, so that corrective measures may, where
possible, be promptly recommended and implemented, and to prevent discrimination in
employment, housing, education, extension of credit or access to public accommodations
on account of an individual's actual or perceived race, color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry or
national origin and in employment, extension of credit and access to public
accommodations on the basis of age; and in employment and housing on the basis of
familial status; and in employment because of the previous assertion of a claim or right
against a prior employer under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A and because of protected
activity under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B; and to prevent discrimination or
retaliation on the basis of an assertion of rights under this Act or interference with an
individual's right to be free from discrimination prohibited under this Act.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§6-B is enacted to read:
6-B. Party. "Party" has the same meaning as in Title 21-A, section 1, subsection 28.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§8-I is enacted to read:
8-I. Political affiliation. "Political affiliation" means belonging to or endorsing a
party or a particular political philosophy, creed or ideal.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §4571, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §4, is further amended to
read:
§4571. Right to freedom from discrimination in employment
The opportunity for an individual to secure employment without discrimination
because of race, color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental
disability, religion, political affiliation, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status is
recognized as and declared to be a civil right. The provisions of this subchapter regarding
political affiliation do not apply to an employer that is a party or is affiliated with, is an
agent of or that performs services on behalf of a party.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §4572, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 293, Pt. B, §2; c. 366,
§5 and c. 476, §1, is further amended to read:
1. Unlawful employment discrimination. It is unlawful employment discrimination,
in violation of this Act, except when based on a bona fide occupational qualification:
A. For any employer to fail or refuse to hire or otherwise discriminate against any
applicant for employment because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender
identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, age, ancestry,
national origin or familial status, because of the applicant's previous assertion of a
claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of previous actions taken
by the applicant that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or because
Page 1 - 132LR0320(01)

413 the applicant sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former
424 section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110; or, because of those reasons, to discharge an
435 employee or discriminate with respect to hire, tenure, promotion, transfer,
446 compensation, terms, conditions or privileges of employment or any other matter
457 directly or indirectly related to employment; or, in recruiting of individuals for
468 employment or in hiring them, to utilize any employment agency that the employer
479 knows or has reasonable cause to know discriminates against individuals because of
580 their race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental
591 disability, religion, political affiliation, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status,
1502 because of their previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title
1513 39‑A, because of previous actions that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7,
1524 subchapter 5‑B or because the applicant sought and received an order of protection
1535 under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110.
(1) This paragraph does not apply to discrimination governed by Title 39‑A,
section 353;
B. For any employment agency to fail or refuse to classify properly, refer for
employment or otherwise discriminate against any individual because of race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
political affiliation, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, because of the
individual's previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A,
because of previous actions taken by the individual that are protected under Title 26,
chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or because the individual sought and received an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110; or to
comply with an employer's request for the referral of job applicants if a request
indicates either directly or indirectly that the employer will not afford full and equal
employment opportunities to individuals regardless of their race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political
affiliation, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, because of previous
assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of previous
actions that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or because the
individual sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section
4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110;
C. For any labor organization to exclude from apprenticeship or membership or to
deny full and equal membership rights to any applicant for membership because of race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, political affiliation, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, because
of the applicant's previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title
39‑A, because of previous actions taken by the applicant that are protected under Title
26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or because the applicant sought and received an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110; or,
because of those reasons, to deny a member full and equal membership rights, expel
from membership, penalize or otherwise discriminate with respect to hire, tenure,
promotion, transfer, compensation, terms, conditions or privileges of employment,
representation, grievances or any other matter directly or indirectly related to
membership or employment, whether or not authorized or required by the constitution
or bylaws of that labor organization or by a collective labor agreement or other
Page 2 - 132LR0320(01)

417 contract; to fail or refuse to classify properly or refer for employment or otherwise
428 discriminate against any member because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
439 gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, age,
540 ancestry, national origin or familial status, because of the member's previous assertion
551 of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of previous actions
562 taken by the member that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or
573 because the applicant sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A,
584 former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110; or to cause or attempt to cause an
595 employer to discriminate against an individual in violation of this section, except that
1506 it is lawful for labor organizations and employers to adopt a maximum age limitation
1517 in apprenticeship programs, if the employer or labor organization obtains prior
1528 approval from the Maine Human Rights Commission of any maximum age limitation
1539 employed in an apprenticeship program. The commission shall approve the age
1640 limitation if a reasonable relationship exists between the maximum age limitation
1651 employed and a legitimate expectation of the employer in receiving a reasonable return
1662 upon the employer's investment in an apprenticeship program. The employer or labor
1673 organization bears the burden of demonstrating that such a relationship exists;
D. For any employer, employment agency or labor organization, prior to employment
or admission to membership of any individual, to:
(1) Elicit or attempt to elicit information directly or indirectly pertaining to race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, political affiliation, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, any
previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, any
previous actions that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or any
previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A,
former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110;
(2) Make or keep a record of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender
identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, age, ancestry,
national origin or familial status, any previous assertion of a claim or right under
former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, any previous actions that are protected under Title
26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or any previous actions seeking and receiving an
order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section
4110, except that, in relation to physical or mental disability, when an employer
requires a physical or mental examination prior to employment, a privileged record
of that examination is permissible if made and kept in compliance with this Act;
(3) Use any form of application for employment, or personnel or membership
blank containing questions or entries directly or indirectly pertaining to race or
color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, political affiliation, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, any
previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, any
previous actions that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or any
previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A,
former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110. This section does not prohibit
any officially recognized government agency from keeping records permitted to be
kept under this Act in order to provide free services to individuals requesting
rehabilitation or employment assistance;
Page 3 - 132LR0320(01)

(4) Print, publish or cause to be printed or published any notice or advertisement
relating to employment or membership indicating any preference, limitation,
specification or discrimination based upon race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, age,
ancestry, national origin or familial status, any previous assertion of a claim or
right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, any previous actions that are protected
under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or any previous actions seeking and
receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title
19-A, section 4110; or
(5) Establish, announce or follow a policy of denying or limiting, through a quota
system or otherwise, employment or membership opportunities of any group
because of the race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or
mental disability, religion, political affiliation, age, ancestry, national origin or
familial status, because of the previous assertion of a claim or right under former
Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of previous actions that are protected under Title
26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or because of any previous actions seeking and
receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title
19-A, section 4110, of that group; or
E. For an employer, employment agency or labor organization to discriminate in any
manner against individuals because they have opposed a practice that would be a
violation of this Act or because they have made a charge, testified or assisted in any
investigation, proceeding or hearing under this Act. This paragraph does not limit the
liability of persons pursuant to section 4633.
Sec. 6. 5 MRSA §4581, first ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §7 and c. 476, §2,
is further amended to read:
The opportunity for an individual to secure housing in accordance with the individual's
ability to pay, and without discrimination because of race, color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry,
national origin or familial status or because the individual has sought and received an order
of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110, is hereby
recognized as and declared to be a civil right.
Sec. 7. 5 MRSA §4581-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §§8 to 10 and c. 476,
§3, is further amended to read:
§4581-A. Unlawful housing discrimination
It is unlawful housing discrimination, in violation of this Act:
1. Sale or rental of housing and other prohibited practices. For any owner, lessee,
sublessee, managing agent or other person having the right to sell or rent or manage a
housing accommodation, or any agent of these, to:
A. Make or cause to be made any written or oral inquiry concerning the race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
political affiliation, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous actions
seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or
Title 19-A, section 4110 of any prospective purchaser, occupant or tenant of the
housing accommodation;
Page 4 - 132LR0320(01)

B. Refuse to show or refuse to sell, rent, lease, let or otherwise deny to or withhold
from any person the housing accommodation because of race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political
affiliation, ancestry, national origin or familial status or because the person sought and
received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A,
section 4110;
C. Make, print or publish or cause to be made, printed or published any notice,
statement or advertisement relating to the sale, rental or lease of the housing
accommodation that indicates any preference, limitation or discrimination based upon
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, political affiliation, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous
actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section
4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110 or an intention to make any such preference, limitation
or discrimination;
D. Discriminate against any person because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry,
national origin or familial status or because the person sought and received an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110 in the
price, terms, conditions or privileges of the sale, rental or lease of any housing
accommodations or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection with any
housing accommodations; or
E. Evict or attempt to evict any tenant of any housing accommodation because of the
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, political affiliation, ancestry, national origin or familial status of the tenant or
because the tenant sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former
section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110;
2. Selling, brokering or appraising of housing. For any real estate broker or real
estate salesperson, or any agent of these, to:
A. Fail or refuse to show any person a housing accommodation listed for sale, lease or
rent because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or
mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry, national origin or familial
status or because the person sought and received an order of protection under Title
19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110;
B. Misrepresent, for the purpose of discriminating because of race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, political
affiliation, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous actions seeking and
receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A,
section 4110, the availability or asking price of a housing accommodation listed for
sale, lease or rent or for such reason to fail to communicate to the person having the
right to sell, rent or lease the housing accommodation any offer for the same made by
any applicant;
C. In any other manner to discriminate against any applicant for a housing
accommodation because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity,
physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry, national origin or
Page 5 - 132LR0320(01)

415 familial status or because the applicant sought and received an order of protection under
426 Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110;
D. Make or cause to be made any written or oral inquiry or record concerning the race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, political affiliation, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous
actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section
4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110 of any applicant for or intended occupant of a housing
accommodation; or
E. Accept for listing any housing accommodation when the person having the right to
sell, rent or lease the housing accommodation has directly or indirectly indicated an
intention of discriminating among prospective tenants or purchasers on the ground of
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, political affiliation, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous
actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section
4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110, or when the broker or salesperson knows or has
reason to know that the person having the right to sell, rent or lease the housing
accommodation has made a practice of discrimination since July 1, 1972;
3. Making of loans; other financial assistance. For any person to whom application
is made for a loan or other form of financial assistance for the acquisition, construction,
rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of any housing accommodation, whether secured or
unsecured, or agent of the person, to:
A. Make or cause to be made any oral or written inquiry concerning the race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
political affiliation, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous actions
seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, former section 4007 or
Title 19-A, section 4110 of any applicant for financial assistance or of existing or
prospective occupants or tenants of housing accommodations; or
B. Discriminate in the granting of financial assistance, or in the terms, conditions or
privileges relating to obtaining or the use of any financial assistance, against any
applicant because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical
or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry, national origin, familial
status or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title
19‑A, former section 4007 or Title 19-A, section 4110; or
4. Receipt of public assistance. For any person furnishing rental premises or public
accommodations to refuse to rent or impose different terms of tenancy to any individual
who is a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance, including medical assistance
and housing subsidies, primarily because of the individual's status as recipient.
Sec. 8. 5 MRSA §4583, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §11, is further amended to
read:
§4583. Application
Nothing in this Act may be construed to prohibit or limit the exercise of the privilege
of every person and the agent of any person having the right to sell, rent, lease or manage
a housing accommodation to set up and enforce specifications in the selling, renting,
leasing or letting or in the furnishings of facilities or services in connection with the
Page 6 - 132LR0320(01)

415 facilities that are consistent with business necessity and are not based on the race, color,
426 sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, country of
437 ancestral political affiliation, ancestry, national origin or familial status of or the receipt of
448 public assistance payments by any prospective or actual purchaser, lessee, tenant or
459 occupant. Nothing in this Act may be construed to prohibit or limit the exercise of the
560 privilege of every person and the agent of any person making loans for or offering financial
571 assistance in the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of housing
582 accommodations to set standards and preferences, terms, conditions, limitations or
593 specifications for the granting of loans or financial assistance that are consistent with
1504 business necessity and are not based on the race, color, sex, sexual orientation or gender
1515 identity, physical or mental disability, religion, country of ancestral political affiliation,
1526 ancestry, national origin or familial status of or the receipt of public assistance payments
1537 by the applicant for a loan or financial assistance or of any existing or prospective owner,
1548 lessee, tenant or occupant of a housing accommodation.
Sec. 9. 5 MRSA §4591, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §12, is further amended to
read:
§4591. Equal access to public accommodations
The opportunity for every individual to have equal access to places of public
accommodation without discrimination because of race, color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry or
national origin is recognized as and declared to be a civil right.
Sec. 10. 5 MRSA §4592, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 489, §§7 to 9, is
further amended to read:
1. Denial of public accommodations. For any public accommodation or any person
who is the owner, lessor, lessee, proprietor, operator, manager, superintendent, agent or
employee of any place of public accommodation to directly or indirectly refuse,
discriminate against or in any manner withhold from or deny the full and equal enjoyment
to any person, on account of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, age,
physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry or national origin, any
of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, services or privileges of public
accommodation, or in any manner discriminate against any person in the price, terms or
conditions upon which access to accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, services
and privileges may depend.
For purposes of this subsection, unlawful discrimination also includes, but is not limited
to:
A. The imposition or application of eligibility criteria that screen out or tend to screen
out an individual with a disability or any class of individuals with disabilities from fully
and equally enjoying any goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages or
accommodations, unless the criteria can be shown to be necessary for the provision of
the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages or accommodations being offered;
B. A failure to make reasonable modifications in policies, practices or procedures,
when modifications are necessary to afford the goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages or accommodations to individuals with disabilities, unless, in the case of a
private entity, the private entity can demonstrate that making the modifications would
Page 7 - 132LR0320(01)

415 fundamentally alter the nature of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages
426 or accommodations;
C. A failure to take steps that may be necessary to ensure that no individual with a
disability is excluded, denied services, segregated or otherwise treated differently than
other individuals because of the absence of auxiliary aids and services, unless, in the
case of a private entity, the private entity can demonstrate that taking those steps would
fundamentally alter the nature of the good, service, facility, privilege, advantage or
accommodation being offered or would result in an undue burden; and
D. A private entity's failure to remove architectural barriers and communication
barriers that are structural in nature in existing facilities and transportation barriers in
existing vehicles and rail passenger cars used by an establishment for transporting
individuals, not including barriers that can be removed only through the retrofitting of
vehicles or rail passenger cars by the installation of a hydraulic or other lift, where the
removal is readily achievable.
When the entity can demonstrate that the removal of a barrier under this paragraph is
not readily achievable, a failure to make the goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages or accommodations available through alternative methods if alternative
methods are readily achievable;
Sec. 11. 5 MRSA §4592, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §14, is further
amended to read:
2. Communication, notice or advertisement. For any person to directly or indirectly
publish, display or communicate any notice or advertisement to the effect that any of the
accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges of any place of public
accommodation are refused, withheld from or denied to any person on account of race or
color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, religion,
political affiliation, ancestry or national origin, or that the patronage or custom of any
person belonging to or purporting to be of any particular race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, religion, political
affiliation, ancestry or national origin is unwelcome, objectionable or not acceptable,
desired or solicited, or that the clientele is restricted to any particular race or color, sex,
sexual orientation or gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, religion, political
affiliation, ancestry or national origin. The production of any communication, notice or
advertisement purporting to relate to any place of accommodation is presumptive evidence
in any action that the action was authorized by its owner, manager or proprietor;
Sec. 12. 5 MRSA §4595, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §16, is further amended
to read:
§4595. Right to freedom from discrimination solely on basis of age, race, color, sex,
sexual orientation or gender identity, marital status, ancestry, religion,
political affiliation or national origin in any credit transaction
The opportunity for every individual to be extended credit without discrimination
solely because of any one or more of the following factors: age; race; color; sex; sexual
orientation or gender identity; marital status; ancestry; religion; political affiliation; or
national origin is recognized as and declared to be a civil right.
Page 8 - 132LR0320(01)

Sec. 13. 5 MRSA §4596, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. B, §65, is amended to
read:
§4596. Unlawful credit extension discrimination
It is unlawful credit discrimination for any creditor to refuse the extension of credit to
any person solely on the basis of any one or more of the following factors: age, race, color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, marital status, ancestry, religion, political
affiliation or national origin in any credit transaction. It is not unlawful credit
discrimination to comply with the terms and conditions of any bona fide group credit life,
accident and health insurance plan, for a financial institution extending credit to a married
person to require both spouses to sign a note and a mortgage and to deny credit to persons
under 18 years of age or to consider a person's age in determining the terms upon which
credit will be extended.
Sec. 14. 5 MRSA §4601, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §18, is further amended
to read:
§4601. Right to freedom from discrimination in education
The opportunity for an individual at an educational institution to participate in all
educational, counseling and vocational guidance programs, all apprenticeship and on-the-
job training programs and all extracurricular activities without discrimination because of
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, a physical or mental disability, ancestry, national
origin, race, color or, religion or political affiliation is recognized and declared to be a civil
right.
Sec. 15. 5 MRSA §4602, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §19, is further
amended to read:
1. Unlawful educational discrimination. It is unlawful educational discrimination
in violation of this Act, on the basis of sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical
or mental disability, ancestry, national origin, race, color or, religion or political affiliation,
to:
A. Exclude a person from participation in, deny a person the benefits of, or subject a
person to, discrimination in any academic, extracurricular, research, occupational
training or other program or activity;
B. Deny a person equal opportunity in athletic programs;
C. Apply any rule concerning the actual or potential familial status or marital status of
a person or to exclude any person from any program or activity because of pregnancy
or related conditions or because of sex or sexual orientation or gender identity;
D. Deny a person admission to the institution or program or to fail to provide equal
access to and information about an institution or program through recruitment; or
E. Deny a person financial assistance availability and opportunity.
Sec. 16. 5 MRSA §4630, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 489, §10, is amended
to read:
1. Unlawful discrimination. A public entity may not discriminate against an
individual, exclude an individual from participation in a service, program or activity of that
public entity or otherwise deny to an individual the benefits of a service, program or activity
Page 9 - 132LR0320(01)

413 of that public entity by reason of the individual's race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
424 gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, religion, political affiliation, ancestry or
435 national origin.